District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1205.03

Functions.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 223, 46 DCR 6373
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-169, § 4, 47 DCR 5846
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 138, 52 DCR 10637

History

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 223 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-415, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7296).

Emergency Legislation